Utah statutes.
17-36-15.1.   Adoption of budget.

(1)  This section does not apply to a county of the first class.

(2)  On or before the last day of each fiscal period, the governing body by resolution shall adopt the budget which, subject to further amendment, shall thereafter be in effect for the next fiscal period.  A copy of the final budget, and of any subsequent amendment thereof, shall be certified by the budget officer and filed with the state auditor not later than 30 days after its adoption.  A copy, similarly certified, shall be filed in the office of the budget officer for inspection by the public during business hours.



Enacted by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

